Florida, session 2026, SB1612.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (5) of section 215.322, 14 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 15 215.322âAcceptance of credit cards, charge cards, debit 16 cards, or electronic funds transfers by state agencies, units of 17 local government, and the judicial branch; acceptance of online 18 payments by units of local government.â 19 (1)(a)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to encourage 20 state agencies, and the judicial branch, and require units of 21 local government, to make their goods, services, and information 22 more convenient to the public through the acceptance of payments 23 by credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, or other means of 24 electronic funds transfers to the maximum extent practicable 25 when the benefits to the participating agency and the public 26 substantiate the cost of accepting these types of payments. 27 (b)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to require units of 28 local government to accept payments online. 29 (5)(a)âEach A unit of local government, including a 30 municipality, special district, or board of county commissioners 31 or other governing body of a county, a consolidated or 32 metropolitan government, and any clerk of the circuit court, 33 sheriff, property appraiser, tax collector, or supervisor of 34 elections, shall is authorized to accept payment by use of 35 credit cards, charge cards, bank debit cards, and electronic 36 funds transfers for financial obligations that are owing to such 37 unit of local government, except when another form of payment is 38 required by law, and is authorized to surcharge the person who 39 uses a credit card, charge card, bank debit card, or electronic 40 funds transfer in payment of taxes, license fees, tuition, 41 fines, civil penalties, court-ordered payments, or court costs, 42 or other statutorily prescribed revenues an amount sufficient to 43 pay the service fee charges by the financial institution, 44 vending service company, or credit card company for such 45 services. Such A unit of local government shall verify both the 46 validity of any credit card, charge card, bank debit card, or 47 electronic funds transfer used pursuant to this subsection and 48 the existence of appropriate credit with respect to the person 49 using the card or transfer. The unit of local government does 50 not incur any liability as a result of such verification or any 51 subsequent action taken. 52 (b)âA unit of local government accepting payment under 53 paragraph (a) is required to have a method for accepting such 54 payment online. 55 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds and declares that this act 56 fulfills an important state interest. 57 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.